Hawaii, session 2026, SB2707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that invasive species pose a serious threat to Hawaii's agriculture, urban landscapes, and natural ecosystems.  The coconut rhinoceros beetle has decimated the coconut palm industry on the island of Oahu and is spreading to other islands, altering the landscape aesthetics and threatening food production.  Coffee berry borer and coffee leaf rust have substantially reduced coffee production in the State, and the two-lined spittle bug is devastating pastures, which threatens the viability of Hawaii's livestock industry.  Invasive mammals and birds, such as axis deer, wild pigs, wild goats, and rose-ringed parakeets, are devastating agricultural and natural ecosystems in the counties of Maui, Hawaii, and Kauai.  Additionally, the coqui frog is causing noise pollution and threatening the State's native and endangered species. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience to establish a center on biosecurity research, education, and extension to develop and implement innovative solutions for detecting, monitoring, eradicating, and managing invasive species. SECTION 2.  The university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience shall establish a center on biosecurity research, education, and extension to develop and implement innovative solutions for detecting, monitoring, eradicating, and managing invasive species by: (1)  Developing predictive risk assessment and spread models for anticipated invasive species to guide the State's proactive biosecurity response plans; (2)  Develop rapid detection methods, tracking systems, and eradication protocols for invasive species; (3)  Develop and implement area-wide and community-based solutions, including the use of canines, to detect, eradicate, and manage invasive species in collaboration with the department of agriculture and biosecurity and other agencies and organizations; (4)  Identify chemical control options through the IR-4 program and work with the department of agriculture and biosecurity to register them in Hawaii; (5)  Identify and evaluate biocontrol agents under biocontainment and coordinate their multiplication and release for managing invasive species; (6)  Provide rapid pest and disease diagnostics through the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's plant pest and disease diagnostics and animal disease diagnostics labs; (7)  Disseminate data and information to the public through a dedicated website and public campaigns through the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience's cooperative extension; (8)  Collaborate with governmental, non-profit, and for-profit organizations in developing useful byproducts from established invasive species, including but not limited to timber, fiber, meat, animal feed, biofertilizer, and biochar; and (9)  Develop a certificate and a one-year professional master's degree in biosecurity. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $45,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience to establish a center on biosecurity research, education, and extension, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $25,000,000 for design, plans, and construction of biocontainment labs and greenhouses; (2)  $18,000,000 for design, plans, and construction of a standard office and laboratory building and an outdoor canine facility for detector dogs; and (3)  $2,000,000 to establish two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) extension agents in wildlife and weed management, one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) risk assessment/spread modeling scientist, one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) data manager, one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) website and information dissemination specialist, three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE) administrative professional technical laboratory technicians, one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) administrative professional technical fiscal support specialist, and one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) administrative professional technical office support. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________